Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201947-1006
Rules and regulations.

(1) On or before October 1, 2019, each detention facility in this state shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the Healthy Pregnancies for Incarcerated Women Act. A detention facility may also adopt and promulgate such rules and regulations developed by the Jail Standards Board or the Nebraska Commission on Law Enforcement and Criminal Justice. Such rules and regulations shall be included in any handbook for prisoners or detainees.

(2) On and after October 1, 2019, a detention facility shall inform each prisoner or detainee of the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated under this section upon admission to the detention facility.

(3) On or before November 1, 2019, a detention facility shall inform any prisoner or detainee in custody of the detention facility, who has not previously been informed, of the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated under this section.

Laws 2019, LB690, § 6.
September 1, 2019